Wisconsin, session 2025, AB542.
do enact as follows:AB542,11Section 1. 609.28 of the statutes is created to read:AB542,2,62609.28 Dental provider network rental. (1) A defined network plan, 3preferred provider plan, limited service health organization, or other insurer that 4offers coverage of dental services, has a network of participating dental service 5providers, and engages in the practice of renting its network of participating dental 6service providers to other entities shall do all of the following:AB542,2,117(a) Include in any contract with a dental service provider entered into, 8modified, or renewed more than 30 days after the effective date of this paragraph .... 9[LRB inserts date], a notification that the plan, organization, or insurer engages in 10the practice of network rental and a list of all current entities to which the network 11may be rented.AB542,2,1712(b) Notify a dental service provider, electronically or in writing, that the plan, 13organization, or insurer has entered into an agreement with an entity under which 14the dental service provider’s contract is rented to the entity. The notification under 15this paragraph shall identify the entity and be provided within 45 days of the date 16of the rental of the contract on which the plan, organization, or insurer enters into 17the agreement.AB542,2,2218(2) Any person who obtains a network of participating dental service 19providers through rental from a defined network plan, preferred provider plan, 20limited service health organization, or other insurer shall abide by all terms and 21conditions of the original contract, including discounted rates or fees, between a 22dental service provider and the plan, organization, or insurer.AB542,3,41(3) A dental service provider whose contract has been rented to another 2entity may terminate their participation in the contract with the entity without 3terminating the original contract with the defined network plan, preferred provider 4plan, limited service health organization, or other insurer.AB542,25Section 2. Initial applicability.AB542,3,106(1) For any contracts or agreements containing provisions that conflict with 7this act, this act first applies to contracts or agreements between defined network 8plans, preferred provider plans, limited service health organizations, or other 9insurers and dental service providers that are entered into, modified, or renewed on 10the effective date of this subsection.AB542,3,1111